Washington statutes.
RCW 36.18.014

Fees—Division with county law library—Petition for emancipation for minors.

(1) Revenue collected under this section is subject to division with the county law library under RCW 27.24.070.

(2) For filing a petition for emancipation for minors as required under RCW 13.64.020 a fee up to fifty dollars must be collected.

[ 1995 c 292 s 13.]